Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 6. Sale and Other Disposition of Property

Cross references. —

As to right of heirs, executors, administrators, etc., to redeem real property sold under mortgage or execution within three months, see §

1-18-103

et seq.

For provision that writ of possession shall issue if deed tendered and payment refused, in connection with claimant, his heirs or their guardian, in connection with quieting title, ejectment and rights of occupying claimants, see §

1-32-215

.

As to specific performance in connection with real property and as to actions for purchase money, see §§

1-32-401

to

1-32-405

.

As to validation of conveyance of deceased entrymen, see §

34-5-107

.

As to validation of conveyances by foreign administrators, see §

34-5-108

.

As to validation of conveyances when executed by executor, administrator, etc., see §§

34-5-106

and

34-5-107

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d Executors and Administrators §§ 724 to 831; 71 Am. Jur. 2d Specific Performance § 187.

Modern status of jurisdiction of federal courts, under 28 USC § 1332(a), of diversity actions affecting probate or other matters concerning administration of decedents' estates, 61 ALR Fed 536.

§ 2-7-601.
When conveyance required; generally.

When a person who is bound by contract in writing to convey any real estate dies before making the conveyance, and in all cases when the decedent, if living, might be compelled to make the conveyance, the court may order his personal representative to convey the real estate to the person entitled thereto.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 15, § 50; R.S. 1899, § 4817; C.S. 1910, § 5686; C.S. 1920, § 6958; R.S. 1931, § 88-3301; C.S. 1945, § 6-1801; W.S. 1957, § 2-166; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-801; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to right of successor to enforce conveyance, see §

2-7-608

and notes thereto.

Procedure not exclusive remedy. —

Unless a statute specifically provides that the proceeding in probate is the exclusive remedy, a court having equitable jurisdiction cannot be deprived of its powers in causes of actions brought for specific performance of contracts to convey land, and §

2-7-601

et seq. does not so mandate. Crockett v. Lowther, 549 P.2d 303,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1976).

Nor condition precedent to filing action. —

It is not necessary to pursue the procedure prescribed in §

2-7-601

et seq. as a condition precedent to filing an action. Crockett v. Lowther, 549 P.2d 303,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1976).

And purchaser may assert rights without filing claim. —

It is not necessary for a purchaser under a contract to convey realty to file a claim with the personal representative of the decedent in order to assert his rights under the contract. Crockett v. Lowther, 549 P.2d 303,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1976).

Jurisdiction of probate court to grant specific performance against estate is limited

to cases where decedent was bound by written contract. Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1929).

Right to vacate order for conveyance

of realty of estate, attacked for want of jurisdiction of subject matter, depended on law applicable in collateral attack on judgment. Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1929).

Executrix, if seeking to vacate order authorizing conveyance by estate as representative of unsatisfied creditors, should show that creditors were injuriously affected. Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1929).

Executrix, consenting to petition for conveyance of estate, knowing facts, could not, after five years and without claim of fraud or mistake have order authorizing conveyance vacated. Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1929).

Jurisdiction to appraise. —

Where only interest which heirs had in land subject to lease and option to purchase was under contract to be paid $1,500, their right to payment was personal property, which followed residence of deceased, and appraisal was properly in county of decedent's death. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Where administrator was himself responsible for appointment of appraisers, he could not take advantage of irregularity in having land in another county appraised in county where estate was administered, to defeat his administrator's deed. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Payment to mortgagee as benefit to estate. —

Payment to mortgagee by purchaser for property before applying for conveyance by estate was held no ground for holding estate failed to receive benefit of transaction. Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1929).

Effect of right of first refusal. —

Where lessor's contract with lessees involved negative promise not to sell to anyone else without giving lessee right of first refusal, promise ran with the land and operated as a restraint on alienation in hands of those who succeeded to the title upon the lessor's death, the lessor's heirs, who had right to fix purchase price. In re Rigby's Estate, 62 Wyo. 401, 167 P.2d 964,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1946).

Equitable title held to vest in grantee's heirs. —

While legal title attempted to be conveyed by administrator's deed to grantee who died before deed was executed was void, consideration paid being retained and disposed of as assets of estate, equitable title vested in deceased grantee's heirs. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Adverse possession by heirs. —

Former owner's heirs could not defeat title by adverse possession where purchasers from grantee and heirs of deceased grantee named in administrator's deed had been in exclusive possession for over 10 years, paying taxes and making improvements, on ground heirs were co-tenants as to half interest because one grantee died before deed was executed. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Estoppel of heir acting as administrator. —

Heir who as administrator conveyed realty belonging to estate is estopped in his personal capacity as to what is done in his representative capacity. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

As to exercise of option. —

Where administrator of former owner's estate conceded deed he executed pursuant to option given by decedent is valid as to undivided one-half interest conveyed to one of two named grantees, he could not contend that option in lease, though properly exercised as to that one, was not timely exercised as to the other. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Inadequacy of price. —

Where difference in price may be accounted for, at least in part, by additional improvements during leasehold, fact property was sold by grantees for $5,000 after conveyance to them for $1,500, did not show inadequacy of price invalidating administrator's deed. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Notarization by administrator's attorney. —

Where attorney of administrator notarized papers executed by him, his so doing was at most an irregularity of which administrator could not take advantage to invalidate administrator's deed. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Standard of review. —

The probate court's findings are presumed correct and will stand unless clearly erroneous or inconsistent with the evidence or contrary to the great weight of the evidence. In re Estate of Jackson, 892 P.2d 786,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Frederick, 599 P.2d 550,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of personal representatives of leaseholder to enforce option to purchase contained in lease, 45 ALR2d 1034, superseding subdivision 2 thereof.

§ 2-7-602.
When conveyance required; time and place for hearing; notice.

On presentation of a verified petition by any person claiming to be entitled to the conveyance from a personal representative setting forth the facts upon which the claim is predicated, the court shall appoint a time and place for hearing the petition and notice thereof shall be personally served on the personal representative.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 15, § 51; R.S. 1899, § 4818; C.S. 1910, § 5687; C.S. 1920, § 6959; R.S. 1931, § 88-3302; C.S. 1945, § 6-1802; W.S. 1957, § 2-167; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-802; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to when conveyance required, see §

2-7-601

and notes thereto.

Provisions not exclusive. —

Provisions of this section and §

2-7-606

are not by their terms made exclusive, and a personal representative may be directed to specifically perform a contract for the sale of real estate in a court of equity. Keystone Sheep Co. v. Grear, 72 Wyo. 189, 263 P.2d 138,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1953).

Cited

in

Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(1928); In re Estate of Frederick, 599 P.2d 550,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-7-603.
When conveyance required; hearing.

At the hearing all persons interested in the estate may appear and contest the petition by filing their objections in writing. The court may examine, on oath, the petitioner and all before him for that purpose.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 15, § 52; R.S. 1899, § 4819; C.S. 1910, § 5688; C.S. 1920, § 6960; R.S. 1931, § 88-3303; C.S. 1945, § 6-1803; W.S. 1957, § 2-168; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-803; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to when conveyance required, see §

2-7-601

and notes thereto.

Cited

in

Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(1928); In re Estate of Frederick, 599 P.2d 550,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 2-7-604.
When conveyance required; order for conveyance; journal entry.

If after hearing and examination of the claim the court is satisfied the petitioner is entitled to a conveyance of the real estate described in the petition, an order directing the personal representative to execute a conveyance thereof to the petitioner shall be made and entered on the journal of the court.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 15, § 53; R.S. 1899, § 4820; C.S. 1910, § 5689; C.S. 1920, § 6961; R.S. 1931, § 88-3304; C.S. 1945, § 6-1804; W.S. 1957, § 2-169; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-804; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to when conveyance required, see §

2-7-601

and notes thereto.

Right to conveyance when contract not unconscionable. —

Where contract cannot, as a matter of law, be found unconscionable, the petitioner is entitled to a conveyance of the real estate described in the petition. In re Estate of Frederick, 599 P.2d 550,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1979) (lease and option to purchase).

Cited

in

Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(1928).

§ 2-7-605.
When conveyance required; execution.

The personal representative shall execute the conveyance according to the directions of the order.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 15, § 54; R.S. 1899, § 4821; C.S. 1910, § 5690; C.S. 1920, § 6962; R.S. 1931, § 88-3305; C.S. 1945, § 6-1805; W.S. 1957, § 2-170; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-805; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to when conveyance required, see §

2-7-601

and notes thereto.

Cited

in

Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(1928).

§ 2-7-606.
When conveyance required; dismissal of petition; specific performance.

If upon hearing the right of the petitioner to have specific performance of the contract is found to be doubtful, the court shall dismiss the petition without prejudice to the right of the petitioner, who may at any time within two (2) months thereafter proceed by action to enforce specific performance thereof.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 15, § 55; R.S. 1899, § 4822; C.S. 1910, § 5691; C.S. 1920, § 6963; R.S. 1931, § 88-3306; Laws 1943, ch. 105, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 6-1806; W.S. 1957, § 2-171; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-806; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to when conveyance required, see §

2-7-601

and notes thereto.

Provisions not exclusive. —

Provisions of §

2-7-602

and this section are not by their terms made exclusive, and a personal representative may be directed to specifically perform a contract for the sale of real estate in a court of equity. Keystone Sheep Co. v. Grear, 72 Wyo. 189, 263 P.2d 138,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1953).

Mere increase in value of land does not invalidate contract

and provide justification for denying specific performance. In re Estate of Frederick, 599 P.2d 550,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1979).

Cited

in

Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(1928).

§ 2-7-607.
When conveyance required; title to pass.

Every conveyance made in pursuance of an order or decree as provided in W.S.

2-7-601

or

2-7-604

shall pass title to the estate contracted for as fully as if the contracting party himself was still living and executed the conveyance.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 15, § 56; R.S. 1899, § 4823; C.S. 1910, § 5692; C.S. 1920, § 6964; R.S. 1931, § 88-3307; C.S. 1945, § 6-1807; W.S. 1957, § 2-172; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-807; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to when conveyance required, see §

2-7-601

and notes thereto.

Cited

in

Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(1928).

§ 2-7-608.
When conveyance required; right of successor to enforce.

If the person entitled to the conveyance dies before the commencement or completion of proceedings therefor, any person entitled to succeed to his rights in the contract, or the personal representative of the decedent, may, for the benefit of the person so entitled, commence the proceedings or prosecute any already commenced. The conveyance shall be so made as to vest the estate in the person entitled to it or in the personal representative for his benefit.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 15, § 57; C.S. 1899, § 4824; C.S. 1910, § 5693; C.S. 1920, § 6965; R.S. 1931, § 88-3308; C.S. 1945, § 6-1808; W.S. 1957, § 2-173; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-808; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to when conveyance required, see §

2-7-601

and notes thereto.

Jurisdiction to appraise. —

Where only interest which heirs had in land subject to lease and option to purchase was under contract to be paid $1,500, their right to payment was personal property, which followed residence of deceased, and appraisal was properly in county of decedent's death. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Where administrator was himself responsible for appointment of appraisers he could not take advantage of irregularity in having land in another county appraised in county where estate was administered to defeat his administrator's deed. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Administrator of deceased vendee cannot maintain action

to compel specific performance for conveyance. Boburg v. Prahl, 3 Wyo. 325, 23 P. 70,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1890).

Equitable title held to vest in grantee's heirs. —

While legal title attempted to be conveyed by administrator's deed to grantee who died before deed was executed was void, consideration paid being retained and disposed of as assets of estate, equitable title vested in deceased grantee's heirs. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Adverse possession by heirs. —

Former owner's heirs could not defeat title by “adverse possession” where purchasers from grantee and heirs of deceased grantee named in administrator's deed had been in exclusive possession for over 10 years paying taxes and making improvements, on ground heirs were co-tenants as to half interest because one grantee died before deed was executed. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Exercise of option. —

Where administrator of former owner's estate conceded deed he executed pursuant to option given by decedent is valid as to undivided one-half interest conveyed to one of two named grantees, he could not contend that option in lease though properly exercised as to that one was not timely exercised as to the other. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Inadequacy of price. —

Where difference in price may be accounted for, at least in part, by additional improvements during leasehold, fact property was sold by grantees for $5,000 after conveyance to them for $1,500 did not show inadequacy of price invalidating administrator's deed. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Notarization by administrator's attorney. —

Where attorney of administrator notarized papers executed by him, his so doing was at most an irregularity of which administrator could not take advantage to invalidate administrator's deed. Black v. Beagle, 59 Wyo. 268, 139 P.2d 439, 140 P.2d 594,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1943).

Cited

in

Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(1928).

§ 2-7-609.
When power given in will.

When power to sell, mortgage, lease, pledge or exchange property of the estate is given to any personal representative under the terms of a will, the statutory requirements for such purposes do not apply.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-610.
Equitable conversion; effect thereof.

A testamentary direction to sell real property, or the exercise of a testamentary power of sale of real property constitutes an equitable conversion of real estate into personal property, but shall not affect distribution of the estate under the provisions of the will.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-611.
When real property deemed personalty; when personalty deemed real property.

Real property acquired by the personal representative by the completion of foreclosure proceedings or by the forfeiture of real estate contracts after the death of the decedent is deemed to be personal property for the purpose of administration and distribution of the estate.

In all cases of sale of real property by a personal representative under order of court, the surplus of the proceeds of sale remaining after the payment of debts and charges is deemed to be real property and shall be disposed of in the same proportions as the real property would have been if it had not been sold.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-612.
Purposes for which realty or personalty may be sold; exempt personal property and homestead.

Any real or personal property belonging to the decedent except exempt personal property and the homestead may be sold, mortgaged, pledged, leased or exchanged by the personal representative for any of the following purposes:

The payment of debts and charges against the estate;

The distribution of the estate or any part thereof;

Any other purpose in the best interests of the estate.

Exempt personal property under such provisions as the court may direct, if not set off to the surviving spouse or issue may be sold, mortgaged, pledged, leased, or exchanged, if the surviving spouse or issue consents thereto.

The homestead, under such provisions as the court may direct, if not set off to the surviving spouse or issue, may be sold, mortgaged, pledged, leased or exchanged.

The proceeds from the sale of any exempt personal property or from the sale of the homestead shall be held by the personal representative subject to the rights of the surviving spouse or issue unless the surviving spouse or issue has expressly waived his rights to the proceeds.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Approval of sale affirmed. —

Appellant heirs presented no evidence that family home had intrinsic value nor that with due diligence some of decedent's property could be located to pay off the estate's debts, and thus the court sustained the trial court's findings that a sale of estate property was proper. George v. Allen (In re Estate of George), 2003 WY 129, 77 P.3d 1219,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 2-7-613.
Sale of personalty without court order.

Personal property of a perishable nature and personal property for which there is a regularly established market may be sold by the personal representative without order of court.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-614.
Petition to sell; generally.

A petition to sell, mortgage, exchange, pledge or lease any real or personal property shall set forth the reasons for the petition and describe the property involved. It may apply for different authority as to separate parts of the property, or it may apply in the alternative for authority to sell, mortgage, exchange, pledge or lease. Whenever it is for the best interests of the estate, real and personal property of the estate may be sold, mortgaged, exchanged, pledged or leased as a unit.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Approval of sale affirmed. —

Appellant heirs presented no evidence that family home had intrinsic value nor that with due diligence some of decedent's property could be located to pay off the estate's debts, and thus the court sustained the trial court's findings that a sale of estate property was proper. George v. Allen (In re Estate of George), 2003 WY 129, 77 P.3d 1219,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 2-7-615.
Petition to sell; notice and hearing; exception; court order.

Upon filing of the petition, the court shall fix the time and place of hearing of the petition, and the personal representative shall give notice of the hearing as provided in W.S.

2-7-205

, but as to personal property and as to the lease of real property not specifically devised for a period of not to exceed one (1) year, the court may hear the petition without notice. In those instances where notice is required, the notice shall state briefly the nature of the petition. At the hearing and upon satisfactory proof the court may order the sale, mortgage, exchange, pledge or lease of the property described or any part thereof at such price and upon such terms and conditions as the court may authorize.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Beneficiaries of trusts created in will. —

Any beneficiary of a trust created in a will is not a beneficiary under the will for purposes of the notice requirements of §§

2-7-615

and

2-7-205

.In re Estate of Jones, 782 P.2d 229,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 242

(Wyo. 1989), cert. denied, 496 U.S. 905, 110 S. Ct. 2587, 110 L. Ed. 2d 268, 1990 U.S. LEXIS 2955 (U.S. 1990).

Approval of sale affirmed. —

Appellant heirs presented no evidence that family home had intrinsic value nor that with due diligence some of decedent's property could be located to pay off the estate's debts, and thus the court sustained the trial court's findings that a sale of estate property was proper. George v. Allen (In re Estate of George), 2003 WY 129, 77 P.3d 1219,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

In re Estate of Jones, 782 P.2d 229,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 242

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 2-7-616.
Sale subject to mortgage.

When a claim is secured by a mortgage on property, the court, with the consent of the mortgagee, may order the sale of the property subject to the mortgage, and the consent shall release the estate should a deficiency later appear.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-617.
Extension of credit in sales.

In all sales of property, the court may authorize credit to be given by the personal representative on such terms as the court may prescribe. Credit for more than twelve (12) months shall be extended only after hearing pursuant to notice to interested parties.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-618.
Purchase by holder of lien.

At any sale of real or personal property upon which there is a mortgage, pledge or other lien, the holder of the lien may become the purchaser, and may apply the amount of his lien on the purchase price. If no claim thereon has been filed or allowed, the court, at the hearing on the report of sale and for confirmation of the sale, may examine into the validity and enforceability of the lien or charge and the amount due thereunder and secured thereby, and may authorize the personal representative to accept the receipt of the purchaser for the amount due thereunder and secured thereby as payment pro tanto. If the mortgage, pledge or other lien is a valid claim against the estate and has been allowed, the receipt of the purchaser for the amount due him from the proceeds of the sale is a payment pro tanto. If the amount for which the property is purchased, whether or not a claim for it has been filed or allowed, is insufficient to defray the expenses and discharge his mortgage, pledge or other lien, the purchaser shall pay an amount sufficient to pay the balance of the expenses. Nothing permitted under this section shall be deemed to be an allowance of a claim based upon such mortgage, pledge or other lien.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-619.
Bond to prevent sale; liability for breach; effect of compliance.

Any person interested in the estate may prevent a sale, mortgage, pledge, exchange or lease of the whole or any part of the real estate or personal property for any purpose by giving bond to the satisfaction of the court, conditioned that he will pay such demands against the estate as the court shall require not to exceed the value of the property thus kept from sale, mortgage, pledge, exchange or lease as soon as called upon by the court for that purpose.

If the conditions of the bond are broken the property will be liable for the debts unless it has passed into the hands of innocent purchasers, and the personal representative may take possession thereof and sell it under the direction of the court, or he may prosecute the bond, or pursue both remedies at the same time if the court so directs.

If the conditions of the bond are complied with the property shall pass by devise, bequest, distribution or descent as though there had been no debts against the estate.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-620.
Collateral attacks precluded.

No proceedings for sale, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange or conveyance by a personal representative of property belonging to the estate is subject to collateral attack on account of any irregularity in the proceedings which do not deprive the court of jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-621.
Order for sale, generally.

The order shall describe the property to be sold, mortgaged, pledged, exchanged or leased and may designate the sequence in which the several parcels shall be sold, mortgaged, pledged, exchanged or leased. An order for sale may direct whether the property shall be sold at private sale or public auction, and the place or places of sale. The order of sale may prescribe the terms, conditions and manner of sale. The court may provide for appraisal for its guidance as to value of the property, and determine whether or not additional bond shall be deposited by the personal representative. If real property is to be mortgaged, the order may fix the maximum amount of principal, the earliest and latest dates of maturity and the purposes for which the proceeds shall be used. An order for sale, mortgage, pledge, exchange or lease shall remain in force until terminated by the court.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-622.
Notice of auction required.

In all sales of property at public auction the personal representative shall give notice as provided in W.S.

2-7-202

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-623.
Adjournment of sale.

The personal representative may adjourn any sale when in his discretion it is deemed for the best interests of the estate, but no adjournment shall be to a time more than three (3) months from the date first fixed for the sale. Every adjournment shall be announced publicly at the time and place at which adjournment is made.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-624.
Verified report required; confirmation of sale, by court; hearing may be ordered.

After making any sale, mortgage, exchange or lease of real property, the personal representative shall make a verified report thereof to the court. The court shall examine the report and if satisfied that the sale, mortgage, exchange or lease has been at a price and upon terms advantageous to the estate and in all respects made in conformity with law, and that it ought to be confirmed, shall confirm the sale, mortgage, exchange or lease and order the personal representative to deliver a deed, mortgage, lease or other proper instruments to the person entitled thereto.

If the real property has been sold at private sale without an appraisal for purpose of sale, or if it has been appraised and has been sold at private sale for less than the appraised value, upon filing of the report the court may enter an order fixing a time and place for [a] hearing and a notice of the hearing shall be served upon all interested persons. Prior to the time fixed for the hearing, any person receiving notice may file written objections to the entry of an order approving the sale. If the court is not satisfied that the sale, mortgage, exchange or lease has been made in conformity with law and that it is in the best interests of the estate, it may reject the sale, mortgage, exchange or lease and enter an order it deems advisable.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1982, ch. 74, § 2.

§ 2-7-625.
Joining report with petition.

The report of any private sale, mortgage, exchange or lease of real property, as provided in W.S.

2-7-624

may be joined with the petition provided in W.S.

2-7-614

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-626.
Recording.

When real property is conveyed, encumbered or leased, the personal representative shall file a certified copy of the order of court entered under W.S.

2-7-624

together with the instrument of conveyance, encumbrance or lease in the office of the county clerk of the county or counties in which the real estate is located.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-627.
Optional procedure.

In those instances to which W.S.

2-3-501

through

2-3-504

are applicable, the personal representative may proceed thereunder or proceed under W.S.

2-7-612

to

2-7-626

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.